California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102202.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102203.

Subject to the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 102330) or Article 8 (commencing with Section 102350) of this chapter, the district may levy, and collect, or cause to be collected, taxes for any lawful purpose, as provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 948.)
-------------------------------------------

102204.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, district elections shall be called, held, and conducted as provided by law for county elections. Except in cases of emergency or compelling public need, as determined by the district, district elections, including those held pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 102330) or Article 8 (commencing with Section 102350), or Article 1 (commencing with Section 102500) of Chapter 7, shall be held and consolidated with city, county, or state elections, or any election held under the Uniform District Election Law
 (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 211.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

102205.

(a) The district shall annually submit its tentative or proposed budget to the legislative body of each voting entity, within the time and in the manner required in this section.

(b) The tentative or proposed budget and the final adopted budget shall, at a minimum, include the following information for the applicable fiscal year:

(1) The projected cost of service.

(2) The projected revenue from fares.

(3) The Transportation Development Act allocation for each member entity that is reserved for the district for operating purposes, as
 set forth in the finding of apportionment by the applicable transportation planning agency.

(4) The projected revenue from any contract of the type described in subdivision (b) of Section 102100.2.

(5) The projected revenue from any other local funds made available to the district by a voting entity for the operation of public transit service.

(6) The amount of the federal formula grant funds that was available and eligible for use during the prior fiscal year for operating purposes within the Sacramento urbanized area, including funds for cities and counties that are not represented on the board.

(7) The amount of the federal formula grant funds described in paragraph (6) that was allocated to entities other than the district.

(8) The amount obtained by subtracting the amount described in paragraph (7) from the amount described in paragraph (6), which amount represents the federal formula grant funds that were available and eligible for use by the district for operating purposes during the prior fiscal year.

(9) A projection of the revenue from any other source that will be available to the district for operating purposes during the fiscal year.

(10) The population of each voting entity, as measured by the population statistics used by the applicable transportation planning agency to allocate Transportation Development Act funds for the same fiscal year for which the budget is adopted.

(c) The tentative or proposed budget shall be submitted to the legislative body of each voting
 entity not less than 60 days before its adoption by the board. It shall be submitted for review and comment. The board may adopt the budget after submission to the legislative body of each voting entity, but shall consider any comments made by those legislative bodies on the budget.

(d) Concurrent with adoption of the budget, the board shall make an affirmative finding that the proposed level of service, reflected in the statement of proposed operation and level of service, to be rendered in any voting entity, is commensurate with the level of tax or financial support to be derived from each such voting entity. In determining the level of service, the board shall consider user benefits and community benefits, in terms of one or more of the following factors:

(1) Availability of service.

(2) Patronage.

(3) Population.

(4) Capital improvements.

(e) The board shall adopt its budget at a public hearing held after the submission of the tentative or proposed budget. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code and shall be made not later than the 15th day before the date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 92, Sec. 12.   (AB 1924)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [102220. - 102225.]

102220.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102221.

The district may contract with any department or agency of the United States of America, with any public agency, or with any person upon such terms and conditions as the board finds is for the best interest of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102222.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), contracts for the purchase of supplies, equipment, and materials in excess of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000) shall be by contract let to the lowest responsible bidder or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder that submitted a proposal that provides the best value, as defined in paragraph (1), to the district
 on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation.

(1) For purposes of this section, “best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(2) To the extent practicable, when the expected procurement required exceeds three thousand dollars ($3,000) but does not exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
 ($125,000), a minimum of three quotations shall be obtained, either written or oral, which permit prices and other terms to be compared.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) do not apply in the case of an emergency declared by a four-fifths vote of the board of directors.

(c) This section applies solely to the procurement of supplies, equipment, and materials and shall not apply to construction contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 182, Sec. 4.   (AB 2015)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

102223.

Notwithstanding Section 102222 or any other provision of law, the district may procure one or more streetcars that operated more than 50 years ago in the district’s service area without having to comply with competitive bidding procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1007, Sec. 8.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

102224.

The district may insure against any accident or destruction of the system or any part thereof. The district may insure against loss of revenues from any cause whatsoever. It may provide, in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of any bonds, for the carrying of insurance in such amount and of such character as may be specified, and for the payment of the premiums thereon. The district may also provide insurance as provided in Part 6 (commencing with Section 989), Division 3.6, Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102225.

The district may contract for the services of independent contractors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Property [102240. - 102244.]

102240.

The district may take by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102240.5.

(a) As used in this section, “transit-oriented joint development project” means a development project for commercial, residential, or mixed-use purposes that is undertaken in connection with existing, planned, or proposed transit facilities and is located one-fourth mile or less from the exterior boundary of the parcel on which that facility is located.

(b) The district may take by gift, or take or convey by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, and hold and enjoy, real and
 personal property of every kind within the district necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, transit-oriented joint development projects.

(c) Any transit-oriented joint development project undertaken pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the general plan, any applicable specific plan, any applicable transit village plan, and the land-use and development ordinances of the city or county in which the project is located.

(d) The district may not exercise its power of eminent domain in order to make an acquisition under this section.

(e) (1) Prior to exercising the authority granted under this section, the district shall prepare, and shall adopt at a public hearing, written policies and procedures implementing this section.

(2) The district shall invite public comment during the preparation and adoption of the policies and procedures required under paragraph (1), including, but not limited to, soliciting the input of community members and organizations and publishing notice of the public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation.

(f) This section applies only to acquisitions related to transit-oriented joint development projects and does not expand the district’s existing powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

102242.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. The district, in exercising such power, shall in addition to the damages for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, also pay the cost, exclusive of betterment and with credit for salvage value, of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, or poles of any public utility which is required to be moved to a new location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------

102243.

The Public Utilities Commission of the state shall have and exercise power and jurisdiction to fix just compensation to be paid for the taking of any property of a public utility in eminent domain proceedings brought by the district. No taking or acquisition by the district which would involve the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of the property of a railroad corporation, as defined in Section 230, shall be permitted, unless the Public Utilities Commission, after a hearing, shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of such property and that such taking or acquisition will not unreasonably
 impair the ability of the railroad corporation involved to provide safe, adequate, economical, and efficient service. The district may commence and maintain such eminent domain proceedings in the Public Utilities Commission or the superior court at its option.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102244.

The district is entitled to the benefit of any reservation or grant, in all cases, where any right has been reserved or granted to any public agency to construct or maintain roads, highway or other crossings over any public or private lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Transit Planning [102260. - 102265.]

102260.

The district shall adopt and maintain a general transit plan for the district. The district may designate one of the transit plans it is otherwise required to prepare as the general transit plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 9.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

102261.

The general transit plan, or any element or amendment thereof, shall be adopted in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102262.

Before adopting the plan, or an element or amendment thereof, the board shall refer the plan or element or amendment thereof to the advisory commission, if the commission has been established under Article 3 (commencing with Section 102140) of Chapter 4 of this part. Failure of the advisory commission to consider such matters within a reasonable time as established by the board shall not prevent the board from acting under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102263.

Before adopting the plan, or an element or amendment thereof, the board shall hold a public hearing. Notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 30 days before the hearing. The notice shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code and written notice shall also be mailed to each city council and board of supervisors in the district. The hearing may be continued from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102264.

The adoption of the general plan, or an element or amendment thereof, shall be by resolution of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102265.

The Sacramento Area Council of Governments shall be the long-range planning agency advising the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [102280. - 102289.]

102280.

The district may provide transit service for the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by any means, both within and outside the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102281.

The district may provide charter bus service, special school service, and other service to the extent permitted under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 10.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

102282.

The board may contract with a public agency or person to provide transit facilities and services for the district. A public agency may contract with the district to provide transit facilities and services for the public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 11.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

102283.

The district may construct and operate or acquire and operate transit works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any state or public highway or any stream, bay or water course, or over any of the lands which are the property of the state, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102284.

(a) The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any public agency or public utility operating transit facilities; may enter into agreements with any public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, and wholly or partially within or without the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of the public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers or pooling arrangements.

(b) In addition to any power described in subdivision (a), the district may enter into agreements for the joint use or joint development of any property or rights by the district and any public agency, or public utility operating transit facilities or nontransit facilities, or both, or any other person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, either, in whole or in part, within or outside the district, for the joint use or development of any nontransit facilities of the district or of the public agency, public utility, person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, for the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers, pooling arrangements, station cost-sharing, connector fees, or land, air, or development rights, sales or leasing, necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, the full exercise of the powers granted in this chapter. For
 the purpose of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Joint development” includes, but is not limited to, agreements with any person, firm, corporation, association, organization, or other entity, public or private, to develop or to engage in the planning, financing, construction, or operation of nontransit district facilities or development projects adjacent, or physically or functionally related, to district transit facilities.

(2) “Development project” includes, but is not limited to, projects for any use or mixed use including public, commercial, or residential uses.

(3) “Nontransit facilities,” includes, but is not limited to, any land, buildings, or equipment, or interest therein, that is used for the production of transit revenue not arising from the operation of a transit
 system.

(c) Construction projects or works of improvement for facilities authorized by the district under the terms of a joint development agreement that is approved under the authority conferred by this section shall be considered a public works project subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code and shall be enforced by the Department of Industrial Relations in the same manner in which it carries out this responsibility under the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 250, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

102285.

The rates and charges, if any, for transit service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102286.

The district shall be subject to the provisions of Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500) of the Vehicle Code with respect to operation of buses and to the rules and regulations enforceable by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to that chapter regulating the safe operation of buses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102287.

The district and any one or more school districts may enter into agreements pursuant to which school transportation equipment may be used by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102288.

(a) The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, parking lots, and any and all facilities necessary or convenient for transit service, within or partly outside the district, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon or over public streets or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons or vehicles thereto, and may acquire any interest in or
 rights to use or joint use of any or all of the foregoing; however, installations in state freeways are subject to the approval of the Department of Transportation, and installations in other state highways are subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 670) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of the Streets and Highways Code. Installations in county highways and city streets are subject to similar encroachment permits.

(b) In addition to any power described in subdivision (a), the district may, to the extent that it is not expressly provided for in subdivision (a), develop, lease, jointly develop, or jointly use air rights, land rights, development rights, rights-of-way, rail trackage, entrances and exits, and any and all fixed facilities and structures physically or functionally related to transit service.

(c) Construction projects or works of improvement for facilities authorized by
 the district under the terms of a joint development agreement that is approved under the authority conferred by this section shall be considered a public works project subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code and shall be enforced by the Department of Industrial Relations in the same manner in which it carries out this responsibility under the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 250, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

102289.

The district may lease or contract for the use of its transit facilities, or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any public agency or any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Public Grants, Loans and Contributions [102310. - 102311.]

102310.

The district may accept, without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, contributions, grants, or loans from any public agency or the United States or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of transit facilities, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, any public agency or the United States, or agency thereof, in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of any such transit facilities in accordance with any legislation which Congress or the Legislature of the State of California may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which
 aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of any such transit facilities. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of such aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted. Any evidence of indebtedness issued under this section shall constitute a negotiable instrument. Laws, or rules or regulations, of this state inconsistent with the laws, or rules and regulations, of the United States, shall not apply to the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of transit facilities funded by the United States, to the extent of the inconsistency, if that inconsistency may result in a loss of federal funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 522, Sec. 12.   (AB 709)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

102311.

The district shall have the power to obtain temporary transfers of funds in accordance with the last paragraph of Section 6 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Property Taxation [102330. - 102345.]

102330.

The district may levy and collect, or cause to be collected, property taxes for any lawful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102331.

(a) In addition to revenues and receipts from other sources, the board may levy and collect a property tax in the entirety of, or a portion of, the incorporated and unincorporated territory. The board may impose different rates of taxation in areas within the district. Authority exercised pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to any applicable constitutional requirements.

(b) If the tax only applies to a portion of an area of the district, both of the following shall
 apply to the imposition of the tax:

(1) The incorporated area of each city and of contiguous cities within the district shall be either wholly included within that portion or wholly excluded from that portion. For purposes of this paragraph, “contiguous cities” means two or more cities with shared borders.

(2) The entire unincorporated area of the district shall either be wholly included within that portion or wholly excluded from that portion.

(c) The proceeds of the property tax shall be used to provide, within the areas taxed, for the improvement or
 acquisition of any real property needed for transportation purposes.

(d) An election to impose a property tax as described in this section shall only include the voters of those portions of the area of the district in which the property tax will be imposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 674, Sec. 1.   (AB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

102332.

The district shall not levy or collect a property tax within any city or within the unincorporated area of the district until:

(a) The legislative body of the city or county adopts a resolution declaring there is need for the district to operate and levy a tax within the city or the unincorporated area of the district.

(b) Two-thirds of the voters of the city or the unincorporated area, following the adoption of the resolution under subdivision (a), voting on the question at an election called for that purpose, approve the operation of the district, and the levy of a property tax by the district, within the city or within the unincorporated
 area of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 117.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102333.

The district may conduct a single election in an area comprising the area of a city and the unincorporated area of the district, or any combination of those areas, with the approval of the cities and the unincorporated area of the district concerned, in which event two-thirds of the voters voting at the election shall be sufficient to approve the proposition submitted for the entire area included in the election. Where more than one election will be held, the approval of the voters in one election pertaining to an area may be conditioned upon the approval of voters in one or more other elections pertaining to other areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 674, Sec. 3.   (AB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

102334.

Each election shall be called and conducted by the district in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of special elections by a county. The board may contract with a county, or delegate to the appropriate county officials the authority, to conduct the election within the county on behalf of the district. The costs of any such election may be advanced to the district by any city or county prior to the time that the district has revenues of its own, to be repaid from subsequent district revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102335.

The ballot for the election shall contain such instructions as are required by law to be printed thereon and in addition thereto, the following:Shall the Sacramento Regional Transit District be authorized to operate and levy a property tax at an annual rate which shall not exceed _______ cents ($0.__) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation within (describe
 city or unincorporated area)?YES◻NO ◻

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102336.

(a) The district board may impose a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code, subject to any applicable constitutional requirements. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, or any portion of the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(b) If the tax only applies to a portion of an
 area of the district, both of the following shall apply to the imposition of the tax:

(1) The incorporated area of each city and of contiguous cities within the district shall be either wholly included within that portion or wholly excluded from that portion. For purposes of this paragraph, “contiguous cities” means two or more cities with shared borders.

(2) The entire unincorporated area of the district shall either be wholly included within that portion or wholly excluded from that portion.

(c) The proceeds of the special tax shall be used to provide, within the area taxed, for the operation, maintenance, or acquisition of any public improvement or utility for transportation purposes.

(d) An election to impose a special tax as described in this section shall only include the voters of those portions of the area of the district in which the special tax will be imposed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 674, Sec. 4.   (AB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

102337.

The board shall avail itself of the assessments made by the assessor of any county in which it operates and of the assessments made by the State Board of Equalization for the county and shall take such assessments as the basis for district property taxation and have its property taxes collected by the tax collector of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102338.

The county auditor shall, on or before the third Monday in August of each year, transmit to the board a statement in writing showing the total value of all property within the county lying within an authorized taxing area of the district, ascertained from the assessments referred to in Section 102337.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102339.

The board shall, on or before the first day of September, fix the rate or rates of taxes, designating the number of cents upon each one hundred dollars ($100), and use as a basis the value of property transmitted to the board by the county auditor, which rate of taxation shall be sufficient to raise the amount previously fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102340.

The board shall, immediately after fixing the rate or rates of taxes, transmit to the county auditor of each county in which the board has levied a tax, a statement of the rate of taxes fixed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102341.

The district’s taxes so levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as county taxes. When collected, the net amount, ascertained as provided in this article, shall be paid to the treasurer of the district under the general requirements and penalties provided by law for the settlement of other taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102342.

Whenever any real property has been sold for taxes and has been redeemed, the money paid for redemption shall be apportioned and paid to the district by the county treasurer in the proportion which the tax due to the district bears to the total tax for which the property was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102343.

All taxes levied under this part are a lien on the property on which they are levied. The enforcement of the collection of such taxes shall be in the same manner and by the same means provided by law for the enforcement of liens for county taxes, all the provisions of law relating to the enforcement of the latter being made a part of this part so far as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102344.

The county shall be compensated for services under this article at the rate of 1 percent for collecting the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), and one-fourth of 1 percent for all sums over that amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102345.

In lieu of, or in addition to, any taxes which may be levied by the district pursuant to this article, the legislative body of any city or county may enter into agreement with the district to make annual contributions to the district from its general funds or from any other source of funds legally available to it for such purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Retail Transactions and Use Tax [102350. - 102355.]

102350.

(a) A retail transactions and use tax ordinance may be adopted by the board in accordance with the provisions of Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, provided two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to authorize its enactment at a special election called for that purpose by the board, subject to any applicable constitutional requirements.

(b) The board, in the ordinance, shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed, the tax rate or the maximum tax rate, the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used, and the portion of the area of the board to which the tax would apply, and may set a term
 during which the tax will be imposed. The purposes for which the tax revenues may be used shall be limited to public transit purposes serving the area of jurisdiction of the district, as determined by the board, including the administration of this part and legal actions related thereto. These purposes include expenditures for planning, environmental reviews, engineering and design costs, and related right-of-way acquisition.

(c) As used in this section, “public transit purposes” includes the public transit responsibilities under the jurisdiction of the district as well as any repair, redesign, or ongoing maintenance of a right-of-way upon which transit is intended to travel, or any bikeway, bicycle path, sidewalk, trail, pedestrian access, or pedestrian accessway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 118.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

102351.

(a) The retail transactions and use tax ordinance shall provide for a rate of one-eighth of 1 percent or a multiple thereof. The ordinance shall provide for the tax to be imposed on the entirety of, or a portion of, the incorporated and unincorporated territory within the boundaries of the district, as defined in Section 102052.5. The ordinance shall be subject to voter approval by the electors in those portions of the district to which the tax applies and shall be consistent with Section 102350.

(b) The portion of the area of the board to which the tax would apply shall be determined by the board before the electors vote on the measure.

(c) If the tax only applies to a portion of an area of the district, all of the following shall apply to the imposition of the tax:

(1) The incorporated area of each city and of contiguous cities within the district shall be either wholly included within that portion or wholly excluded from that portion. For purposes of this paragraph, “contiguous cities” means two or more cities with shared borders.

(2) The entire unincorporated area of the district shall either be wholly included within that portion or wholly excluded from that portion.

(3) The revenues derived from the tax shall be spent within, or for the benefit of, the portion of the area of the district to which the tax applies, and shall be spent only
 on allowable transportation and transit infrastructure and services.

(d) Any revenues derived from the tax shall supplement, and not supplant, other transportation revenues available to the portion of the area of the board to which the tax applies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 674, Sec. 6.   (AB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

102352.

(a) Any transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this article shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 150 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(b) (1) Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, the district shall contract with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance. The costs to be covered by the contract may also include services of the types described in Section 7272 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for preparatory work up to the operative date of the ordinance. Any disputes as to the amount of the costs shall be resolved in the same manner as provided in that section.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 7272 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the maximum amount of preparatory costs incurred may exceed those costs as described in paragraph (1) if the increased amount reflects necessary preparatory costs.

(c) Within 45 days from the date the ordinance is approved by the voters, the district shall provide the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration with a complete alphabetical list of all streets within the affected unincorporated area under the jurisdiction of the district pursuant to Section 102052.5, which shall include beginning and ending street numbers, and shall maintain that list on its internet website. The district shall also provide a legal description and a map or plat, that both describe the boundaries of the applicable unincorporated territory within the district pursuant to Section 102052.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 255.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

102355.

Repeal of the transactions and use tax ordinance shall not be operative earlier than the first day of the first calendar quarter following the adoption of the ordinance of repeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 948.)